Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 4. Emergency Fire Suppression Account

§ 36-1-401.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Division” means the Wyoming state forestry division of the office of state lands and investments;

“Emergency fire” means a fire located in a rural area which is, or clearly threatens to be, beyond the fire control resources of the county responsible for suppression of the fire or the state if the fire is located on state lands;

“Emergency fire suppression account” or “account” means the account created by W.S.

36-1-402

;

“Participating county” means a county which has entered into a contract with the division to participate in the emergency fire suppression account and has paid the assessments provided by W.S.

36-1-404

.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 51, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “account” for “fund” in (a)(iv).

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “office of state lands and investments” for “state land office” in (a)(i).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Cited in

State v. Black Hills Power, Inc., 2015 WY 99, 2015 Wyo.
LEXIS 114 (Aug. 3, 2015).

§ 36-1-402.
Emergency fire suppression account; creation; investment of funds; authorized expenditures; reversion of funds from division.

There is created the emergency fire suppression account. The account shall include all legislative appropriations, all assessments paid into the account by participating counties and all income from investments of monies in the account. Appropriations to the account shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal period.

The state treasurer shall invest any portion of the funds in the account which the state forester determines is not needed for immediate use. Investments shall be made as authorized by W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e).

Upon written approval of the state forester, expenditures shall be made out of the account to participating counties and the division for the actual costs of suppressing emergency fires.

If the state forester determines monies in the account may be insufficient to make reimbursement for the full cost of suppressing all emergency fires occurring or which may occur during the year, he may delay paying reimbursement to any entity until the close of the program year at which time available monies shall be prorated among those entitled to reimbursement at an amount less than one hundred percent (100%).

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 87, § 1.

Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) and

9-4-207

, general funds appropriated to the division which are unexpended and unobligated and which would otherwise lapse and revert pursuant to W.S.

9-4-207

(a) at the end of a biennium shall revert to the emergency fire suppression account. This subsection shall not be construed to apply to any appropriation to a special revenue fund or revolving account within the division.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 51, § 1; 1996, ch. 112, § 2; 2005 ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2017 ch. 87, § 1, effective March 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 124, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” in the first sentence in (a).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)” for “W.S.

9-4-711

” in (b).

The 2017 amendment

, added (e).

Laws 2017, ch. 87, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

by ch. 87, § 1, effective June 30, 2020, repealed former (e), which read, “In addition to expenditures made out of the emergency fire suppression account pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) may be expended from the account by the division each fiscal year for bark beetle mitigation projects. Any expenditures under this subsection are subject to the availability of funds in the account and shall only be expended on or after July 1 of each fiscal year and upon approval of the governor. These funds may be expended for bark beetle mitigation on private, state or federal lands pursuant to memoranda of agreement entered into by the division and any appropriate local, state or federal agency. This subsection is repealed effective June 30, 2020.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (f).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 2, subsection 60, effective July 1, 2004, appropriates $2,580,000 to the county emergency fire suppression fund [account]. Of this, $764,490 from the general fund, and $992,500 from federal funds are appropriated effective immediately (March 5, 2004).

Laws 2005, ch. 227, § 1, appropriates $375,000 from the general fund to the state forestry division for the purpose of leasing a helicopter for fire suppression for a period of up to 120 days during the fire season. The act authorizes four additional seasonal positions for the state forestry division to provide helicopter support services and, when not engaged in fire suppression activities, to perform forestry project work pursuant to § 36-2-108(b). The division is to obtain additional helicopter crew support as appropriate from local and county fire service entities.

Laws 2005, ch. 227, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Cited in

State v. Black Hills Power, Inc., 2015 WY 99, 2015 Wyo.
LEXIS 114 (Aug. 3, 2015).

§ 36-1-403.
Powers and duties of state forester.

The state forester shall:

Administer the emergency fire suppression account;

Enter into contracts on behalf of the division with counties desiring to participate in the account;

Establish and collect assessments from participating counties in accordance with this article;

Adopt rules governing the administration of the emergency fire suppression account and to carry out the purposes of this article.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 51, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited in

State v. Black Hills Power, Inc., 2015 WY 99, 2015 Wyo.
LEXIS 114 (Aug. 3, 2015).

§ 36-1-404.
Participation by counties; assessments; withdrawal from participation; forfeiture of assessments for failure to pay assessments.

Counties desiring to participate in the emergency fire suppression account shall enter into a written contract with the state forester and shall pay the assessments provided for in this section.

Each participating county shall pay an annual assessment to the account in an amount equal to:

Four-tenths of a cent ($.004) per acre for each acre of private land in the county as determined by reference to the current equality state almanac published by the department of administration and information; plus

An amount equal to .00002 times the assessed valuation of the county.

Participation in the account shall be on a fiscal year basis and annual assessments shall be paid on or before July 15 of each year in which the county elects to participate in the account.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 8, § 2.

Any county electing to participate in the account in any year may become a participating county by paying an initial assessment equal to the annual assessment computed for that county under subsection (b) of this section multiplied by three (3).

Any county electing to withdraw from participation in the account or failing to pay the annual assessment when due shall forfeit all of its rights to the account and any assessments previously paid by that county shall remain in the account.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 51, § 1; 1987, ch. 197, § 1; 2001, ch. 134, § 1; 2003, ch. 109, § 1; 2005, ch. 76, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 8, §§ 1, 2.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (d), substituted “five million dollars ($5,000,000.00)” for “three million dollars ($3,000,000.00)” and “four million dollars ($4,000,000.00)” for “two million four hundred thousand dollars ($2,400,000.00).”

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “account” for “fund” in (c).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating the amendments by both 2005 acts.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted “Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section,” at the beginning of the introductory language of (b); and repealed former (d), which provided for abatement of county assessments for the emergency fire suppression account.

Laws 2008, ch. 8, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Cited in

State v. Black Hills Power, Inc., 2015 WY 99, 2015 Wyo.
LEXIS 114 (Aug. 3, 2015).